Vermont statutes. Title 24 Municipal and County Government
Subchapter 7. Bylaws

§ 4410.
Regulatory implementation of the municipal plan.

A municipality that has adopted a plan through its bylaws may define and regulate land development in any manner that the municipality establishes in its bylaws, provided those bylaws are in conformance with the plan and are adopted for the purposes set forth in section 4302 of this title. In its bylaws, a municipality may utilize any or all of the tools provided in this subchapter and any other regulatory tools or methods not specifically listed. However, no bylaws shall directly conflict with sections 4412 and 4413 of this title and subchapters 9, 10, and 11 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 115

(Adj. Sess.), § 95.

§ 4411.
Zoning bylaws.

A municipality may regulate land development in conformance with its adopted municipal plan and for the purposes set forth in section 4302 of this title to govern the use of land and the placement, spacing, and size of structures and other factors specified in the bylaws related to public health, safety, or welfare. Zoning bylaws may permit, prohibit, restrict, regulate, and determine land development, including the following:

specific uses of land and shoreland facilities;

dimensions, location, erection, construction, repair, maintenance, alteration, razing, removal, and use of structures;

areas and dimensions of land to be occupied by uses and structures, as well as areas, courts, yards, and other open spaces and distances to be left unoccupied by uses and structures;

timing or sequence of growth, density of population, and intensity of use;

uses within a river corridor and buffer, as those terms are defined in

10 V.S.A. §§ 1422

and 1427.

All zoning bylaws shall apply to all lands within the municipality other than as specifically limited or exempted in accordance with specific standards included within those bylaws and in accordance with the provisions of this chapter. The provisions of those bylaws may be classified so that different provisions may be applied to different classes of situations, uses, and structures and to different and separate districts of the municipality as may be described by a zoning map made part of the bylaws. The land use map required pursuant to subdivision 4382(a)(2) of this title of any municipality may be designated as the zoning map except in cases in which districts are not deemed by the planning commission to be described in sufficient accuracy or detail by the municipal plan land use map. All provisions shall be uniform for each class of use or structure within each district, except that additional classifications may be made within any district for any or all of the following:

To make transitional provisions at and near the boundaries of districts.

To regulate the expansion, reduction, or elimination of certain nonconforming uses, structures, lots, or parcels.

To regulate, restrict, or prohibit uses or structures at or near any of the following:

Major thoroughfares, their intersections and interchanges, and transportation arteries.

Natural or artificial bodies of water.

Places of relatively steep slope or grade.

Public buildings and public grounds.

Aircraft and helicopter facilities.

Places having unique patriotic, ecological, historical, archaeological, or community interest or value, or located within scenic or design control districts.

Flood or other hazard areas and other places having a special character or use affecting or affected by their surroundings.

River corridors, river corridor protection areas, and buffers, as the term “buffer” is defined in

10 V.S.A. § 1422

.

To regulate, restrict, or prohibit uses or structures in overlay districts, as set forth in subdivision 4414(2) of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 115

(Adj. Sess.), § 95; amended

2009, No. 110

(Adj. Sess.), § 6;

2011, No. 138

(Adj. Sess.), § 12, eff. May 14, 2012.

§ 4412.
Required provisions and prohibited effects.

Notwithstanding any existing bylaw, the following land development provisions shall apply in every municipality:

Equal treatment of housing and required provisions for affordable housing.

No bylaw nor its application by an appropriate municipal panel under this chapter shall have the effect of excluding housing that meets the needs of the population as determined in the housing element of its municipal plan as required under subdivision 4382(a)(10) of this title or the effect of discriminating in the permitting of housing as specified in

9 V.S.A. § 4503

.

Except as provided in subdivisions 4414(1)(E) and (F) of this title, no bylaw shall have the effect of excluding mobile homes, modular housing, or prefabricated housing from the municipality, except upon the same terms and conditions as conventional housing is excluded. A municipality may establish specific site standards in the bylaws to regulate individual sites within preexisting mobile home parks with regard to distances between structures and other standards as necessary to ensure public health, safety, and welfare, provided the standards do not have the effect of prohibiting the replacement of mobile homes on existing lots.

No bylaw shall have the effect of excluding mobile home parks, as defined in 10 V.S.A. chapter 153, from the municipality.

Bylaws shall designate appropriate districts and reasonable regulations for multiunit or multifamily dwellings. No bylaw shall have the effect of excluding these multiunit or multifamily dwellings from the municipality.

Except for flood hazard and fluvial erosion area bylaws adopted pursuant to section 4424 of this title, no bylaw shall have the effect of excluding as a permitted use one accessory dwelling unit that is located within or appurtenant to a single-family dwelling on an owner-occupied lot. A bylaw may require a single-family dwelling with an accessory dwelling unit to be subject to the same review, dimensional, or other controls as required for a single-family dwelling without an accessory dwelling unit. An accessory dwelling unit means a distinct unit that is clearly subordinate to a single-family dwelling, and has facilities and provisions for independent living, including sleeping, food preparation, and sanitation, provided there is compliance with all the following:

The property has sufficient wastewater capacity.

The unit does not exceed 30 percent of the total habitable floor area of the single-family dwelling or 900 square feet, whichever is greater.

Nothing in subdivision (1)(E) of this section shall be construed to prohibit:

a bylaw that is less restrictive of accessory dwelling units; or

a bylaw that regulates short-term rental units distinctly from residential rental units.

A residential care home or group home to be operated under State licensing or registration, serving not more than eight persons who have a disability as defined in

9 V.S.A. § 4501

, shall be considered by right to constitute a permitted single-family residential use of property. This subdivision (G) does not require a municipality to allow a greater number of residential care homes or group homes on a lot than the number of single-family dwellings allowed on the lot.

Existing small lots. Any lot that is legally subdivided, is in individual and separate and nonaffiliated ownership from surrounding properties, and is in existence on the date of enactment of any bylaw, including an interim bylaw, may be developed for the purposes permitted in the district in which it is located, even though the small lot no longer conforms to minimum lot size requirements of the new bylaw or interim bylaw.

A municipality may prohibit development of a lot not served by and able to connect to municipal sewer and water service if either of the following applies:

the lot is less than one-eighth acre in area; or

the lot has a width or depth dimension of less than 40 feet.

The bylaw may provide that if an existing small lot subsequently comes under common ownership with one or more contiguous lots, the nonconforming lot shall be deemed merged with the contiguous lot. However, a nonconforming lot shall not be deemed merged and may be separately conveyed if all the following apply:

The lots are conveyed in their preexisting, nonconforming configuration.

On the effective date of any bylaw, each lot was developed with a water supply and wastewater disposal system.

At the time of transfer, each water supply and wastewater system is functioning in an acceptable manner.

The deeds of conveyance create appropriate easements on both lots for replacement of one or more wastewater systems, potable water systems, or both, in case there is a failed system or failed supply as defined in 10 V.S.A. chapter 64.

Nothing in this subdivision (2) shall be construed to prohibit a bylaw that is less restrictive of development of existing small lots.

Required frontage on, or access to, public roads, class 4 town highways, or public waters. Land development may be permitted on lots that do not have frontage either on a public road, class 4 town highway, or public waters, provided that access through a permanent easement or right-of-way has been approved in accordance with standards and process specified in the bylaws. This approval shall be pursuant to subdivision bylaws adopted in accordance with section 4418 of this title, or where subdivision bylaws have not been adopted or do not apply, through a process and pursuant to standards defined in bylaws adopted for the purpose of assuring safe and adequate access. Any permanent easement or right-of-way providing access to such a road or waters shall be at least 20 feet in width.

Protection of home occupations. No bylaw may infringe upon the right of any resident to use a minor portion of a dwelling unit for an occupation that is customary in residential areas and that does not have an undue adverse effect upon the character of the residential area in which the dwelling is located.

Child care. A “family child care home or facility” as used in this subdivision means a home or facility where the owner or operator is to be licensed or registered by the State for child care. A family child care home serving six or fewer children shall be considered to constitute a permitted single-family residential use of property. A family child care home serving no more than six full-time children and four part-time children, as defined in

33 V.S.A. § 3511(7)

, shall be considered to constitute a permitted use of property but may require site plan approval based on local zoning requirements. A family child care facility serving more than six full-time and four part-time children may, at the discretion of the municipality, be subject to all applicable municipal bylaws.

Heights of renewable energy resource structures. The height of wind turbines with blades less than 20 feet in diameter, or rooftop solar collectors less than 10 feet high on sloped roofs, any of which are mounted on complying structures, shall not be regulated unless the bylaws provide specific standards for regulation. For the purpose of this subdivision, a sloped roof means a roof having a slope of more than five degrees. In addition, the regulation of antennae that are part of a telecommunications facility, as defined in

30 V.S.A. § 248a

, may be exempt from review under this chapter according to the provisions of that section.

Nonconformities. All bylaws shall define how nonconformities will be addressed, including standards for nonconforming uses, nonconforming structures, and nonconforming lots.

To achieve the purposes of this chapter set forth in section 4302 of this title, municipalities may regulate and prohibit expansion and undue perpetuation of nonconformities. Specifically, a municipality, in its bylaws, may:

Specify a time period that shall constitute abandonment or discontinuance of that nonconforming use, provided the time period is not less than six months.

Specify the extent to which, and circumstances under which, a nonconformity may be maintained or repaired.

Specify the extent to which, and circumstances under which, a nonconformity may change or expand.

Regulate relocation or enlargement of a structure containing a nonconforming use.

Specify the circumstances in which a nonconformity that is destroyed may be rebuilt.

Specify other appropriate circumstances in which a nonconformity must comply with the bylaws.

If a mobile home park, as defined in 10 V.S.A. chapter 153, is a nonconformity pursuant to a municipality’s bylaws, the entire mobile home park shall be treated as a nonconformity under those bylaws, and individual lots within the mobile home park shall in no event be considered nonconformities. Unless the bylaws provide specific standards as described in subdivision (1)(B) of this section, where a mobile home park is a nonconformity under bylaws, its status regarding conformance or nonconformance shall apply to the parcel as a whole, and not to any individual mobile home lot within the park. An individual mobile home lot that is vacated shall not be considered a discontinuance or abandonment of a nonconformity.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to restrict the authority of a municipality to abate public nuisances or to abate or remove public health risks or hazards.

Communications antennae and facilities. Except to the extent bylaws protect historic landmarks and structures listed on the State or National Register of Historic Places, no permit shall be required for placement of an antenna used to transmit, receive, or transmit and receive communications signals on that property owner’s premises if the area of the largest face of the antenna is not more than 15 square feet, and if the antenna and any mast support do not extend more than 12 feet above the roof of that portion of the building to which the mast is attached.
(8) (A) Communications antennae and facilities. Except to the extent bylaws protect historic landmarks and structures listed on the State or National Register of Historic Places, no permit shall be required for placement of an antenna used to transmit, receive, or transmit and receive communications signals on that property owner’s premises if the area of the largest face of the antenna is not more than 15 square feet, and if the antenna and any mast support do not extend more than 12 feet above the roof of that portion of the building to which the mast is attached.

If an antenna structure is less than 20 feet in height and its primary function is to transmit or receive communication signals for commercial, industrial, institutional, nonprofit, or public purposes, it shall not be regulated under this chapter if it is located on a structure located within the boundaries of a downhill ski area and permitted under this chapter. For the purposes of this subdivision, “downhill ski area” means an area with trails for downhill skiing served by one or more ski lifts and any other areas within the boundaries of the ski area and open to the public for winter sports.

The regulation of a telecommunications facility, as defined in

30 V.S.A. § 248a

, shall be exempt from municipal approval under this chapter when and to the extent jurisdiction is assumed by the Public Utility Commission according to the provisions of that section. This exemption from obtaining approval under this chapter shall not affect the substantial deference to be given to a plan or recommendation based on a local land use bylaw under

30 V.S.A. § 248a

(c)(2)

.

A municipality may regulate communications towers, antennae, and related facilities in its bylaws provided that such regulations do not have the purpose or effect of being inconsistent with subdivisions (A) through (C) of this subdivision (8).

De minimis telecommunications impacts. An officer or entity designated by the municipality shall review telecommunications facilities applications, and upon determining that a particular application will impose no impact or de minimis impact upon any criteria established in the bylaws, shall approve the application.

Planting projects; flood hazard and similar areas. A bylaw under this chapter shall not require the filing of an application or the issuance of a permit by the municipality for a planting project considered to have a permit by operation of subsection 4424(c) of this title.

Accessory on-farm businesses. No bylaw shall have the effect of prohibiting an accessory on-farm business at the same location as a farm.

Definitions. As used in this subdivision (11):

“Accessory on-farm business” means activity that is accessory to a farm and comprises one or both of the following:

The storage, preparation, processing, and sale of qualifying products, provided that more than 50 percent of the total annual sales are from qualifying products that are principally produced on the farm at which the business is located.

Educational, recreational, or social events that feature agricultural practices or qualifying products, or both. Such events may include tours of the farm, farm stays, tastings and meals featuring qualifying products, and classes or exhibits in the preparation, processing, or harvesting of qualifying products. As used in this subdivision (II), “farm stay” means a paid, overnight guest accommodation on a farm for the purpose of participating in educational, recreational, or social activities on the farm that feature agricultural practices or qualifying products, or both. A farm stay includes the option for guests to participate in such activities.

“Farm” means a parcel or parcels owned, leased, or managed by a person, devoted primarily to farming, and subject to the RAP rules. For leased lands to be part of a farm, the lessee must exercise control over the lands to the extent they would be considered as part of the lessee’s own farm. Indicators of such control include whether the lessee makes day-to-day decisions concerning the cultivation or other farming-related use of the leased lands and whether the lessee manages the land for farming during the lease period.

“Farming” shall have the same meaning as in

10 V.S.A. § 6001

.

“Qualifying product” means a product that is wholly:

an agricultural, horticultural, viticultural, or dairy commodity, or maple syrup;

livestock or cultured fish or a product thereof;

a product of poultry, bees, an orchard, or fiber crops;

a commodity otherwise grown or raised on a farm; or

a product manufactured on one or more farms from commodities wholly grown or raised on one or more farms.

“RAP rules” means the rules on required agricultural practices adopted pursuant to 6 V.S.A. chapter 215, subchapter 2.

Eligibility. For an accessory on-farm business to be eligible for the benefit of this subdivision (11), the business shall comply with each of the following:

The business is operated by the farm owner, one or more persons residing on the farm parcel, or the lessee of a portion of the farm.

The farm meets the threshold criteria for the applicability of the RAP rules as set forth in those rules.

Use of structures or land. An accessory on-farm business may take place inside new or existing structures or on the land.

Review; permit. Activities of an accessory on-farm business that are not exempt under section 4413 of this title may be subject to site plan review pursuant to section 4416 of this title. A bylaw may require that such activities meet the same performance standards otherwise adopted in the bylaw for similar commercial uses pursuant to subdivision 4414(5) of this title.

Less restrictive. A municipality may adopt a bylaw concerning accessory on-farm businesses that is less restrictive than the requirement of this subdivision (11).

Notification; training. The Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets shall provide periodic written notification and training sessions to farms subject to the RAP rules on the existence and requirements of this subdivision (11) and the potential need for other permits for an accessory on-farm business, including a potable water and wastewater system permit under 10 V.S.A. chapter 64.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 115

(Adj. Sess.), § 95; amended

2005, No. 172

(Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. May 22, 2006;

2007, No. 79

, § 15;

2007, No. 79

, § 15, eff. June 9, 2007;

2009, No. 54

, § 45, eff. June 1, 2009;

2011, No. 53

, § 14e, eff. May 27, 2011;

2011, No. 137

(Adj. Sess.), § 7, eff. May 14, 2012;

2011, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 14;

2011, No. 170

(Adj. Sess.), § 16e, eff. May 18, 2012;

2013, No. 16

, § 5, eff. May 6, 2013;

2013, No. 96

(Adj. Sess.), § 162;

2013, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 127, eff. May 20, 2014;

2015, No. 130

(Adj. Sess.), § 5b, eff. May 25, 2016;

2017, No. 4

, § 2, eff. March 6, 2017;

2017, No. 130

(Adj. Sess.), § 17;

2017, No. 143

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2019, No. 179

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Oct. 12, 2020.

§ 4413.
Limitations on municipal bylaws.

The following uses may be regulated only with respect to location, size, height, building bulk, yards, courts, setbacks, density of buildings, off-street parking, loading facilities, traffic, noise, lighting, landscaping, and screening requirements, and only to the extent that regulations do not have the effect of interfering with the intended functional use:
(a) (1) The following uses may be regulated only with respect to location, size, height, building bulk, yards, courts, setbacks, density of buildings, off-street parking, loading facilities, traffic, noise, lighting, landscaping, and screening requirements, and only to the extent that regulations do not have the effect of interfering with the intended functional use:

State- or community-owned and operated institutions and facilities;

public and private schools and other educational institutions certified by the Agency of Education;

churches and other places of worship, convents, and parish houses;

public and private hospitals;

regional solid waste management facilities certified under 10 V.S.A. chapter 159;

hazardous waste management facilities for which a notice of intent to construct has been received under

10 V.S.A. § 6606a

.

Except for State-owned and -operated institutions and facilities, a municipality may regulate each of the land uses listed in subdivision (1) of this subsection for compliance with the National Flood Insurance Program and for compliance with a municipal ordinance or bylaw regulating development in a flood hazard area or river corridor, consistent with the requirements of subdivision 2291(25) and section 4424 of this title. These regulations shall not have the effect of interfering with the intended functional use.

A bylaw under this chapter shall not regulate electric generation facilities, energy storage facilities, and transmission facilities regulated under

30 V.S.A. § 248

or subject to regulation under

30 V.S.A. § 8011

.

Except as otherwise provided by this section and by

10 V.S.A. § 1976

, if any bylaw is enacted with respect to any land development that is subject to regulation under State statutes, the more stringent or restrictive regulation applicable shall apply.

A bylaw under this chapter shall not regulate:
(d) (1) A bylaw under this chapter shall not regulate:

required agricultural practices, including the construction of farm structures, as those practices are defined by the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets;

accepted silvicultural practices, as defined by the Commissioner of Forests, Parks and Recreation, including practices that are in compliance with the Acceptable Management Practices for Maintaining Water Quality on Logging Jobs in Vermont, as adopted by the Commissioner of Forests, Parks and Recreation; or

forestry operations.

As used in this section:

“Farm structure” means a building, enclosure, or fence for housing livestock, raising horticultural or agronomic plants, or carrying out other practices associated with accepted agricultural or farming practices, including a silo, as “farming” is defined in

10 V.S.A. § 6001(22)

, but excludes a dwelling for human habitation.

“Forestry operations” has the same meaning as in

10 V.S.A. § 2602

.

A person shall notify a municipality of the intent to build a farm structure and shall abide by setbacks approved by the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets. No municipal permit for a farm structure shall be required.

This subsection does not prevent an appropriate municipal panel, when issuing a decision on an application for land development over which the panel otherwise has jurisdiction under this chapter, from imposing reasonable conditions under subsection 4464(b) of this title to protect wildlife habitat; threatened or endangered species; or other natural, historic, or scenic resources and does not prevent the municipality from enforcing such conditions, provided that the reasonable conditions do not restrict or regulate forestry operations unrelated to land development.

A bylaw enacted under this chapter shall be subject to the restrictions created under section 2295 of this title, with respect to the limits on municipal power to regulate hunting, fishing, trapping, and other activities specified under that section.

This section shall apply in every municipality, notwithstanding any existing bylaw to the contrary.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a bylaw adopted under this chapter shall not:

Regulate the installation, operation, and maintenance, on a flat roof of an otherwise complying structure, of a solar energy device that heats water or space or generates electricity. For the purpose of this subdivision, “flat roof” means a roof having a slope less than or equal to five degrees.

Prohibit or have the effect of prohibiting the installation of solar collectors not exempted from regulation under subdivision (1) of this subsection, clotheslines, or other energy devices based on renewable resources.

Except as necessary to ensure compliance with the National Flood Insurance Program, a bylaw under this chapter shall not regulate any of the following:
(h) (1) Except as necessary to ensure compliance with the National Flood Insurance Program, a bylaw under this chapter shall not regulate any of the following:

an ancillary improvement that does not exceed a footprint of 300 square feet and a height of 10 feet;

the following improvements associated with the construction or installation of a communications line:

the attachment of a new or replacement cable or wire to an existing electrical distribution or communications distribution pole;

the replacement of an existing electrical distribution or communications distribution pole with a new pole, so long as the new pole is not more than 10 feet taller than the pole it replaces.

For purposes of this subsection:

“Ancillary improvement” shall have the same definition as is established in

30 V.S.A. § 248a(b)

.

“Communications line” means a wireline or fiber-optic cable communications facility that transmits and receives signals to and from a local, State, national, or international network used primarily for two-way communications for commercial, industrial, municipal, county, or State purposes.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 115

(Adj. Sess.), § 95; amended

2009, No. 45

, § 15c, eff. May 27, 2009;

2011, No. 53

, § 14, eff. May 27, 2011;

2011, No. 170

(Adj. Sess.), § 16f, eff. May 18, 2012;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 272, eff. Feb. 14, 2014;

2013, No. 107

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. April 18, 2014;

2015, No. 64

, § 52;

2015, No. 171

(Adj. Sess.), § 19;

2021, No. 54

, § 4.